District of Columbia statutes.
9-1205.05

Right to amend, alter or repeal this subchapter reserved.

Congress reserves the right to amend, alter, or repeal this subchapter.

Aug. 6, 1935, 49 Stat. 537, ch. 449, § 5
1981 Ed., § 7-1429.
1973 Ed., § 7-1229.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).